Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-307
Assisting suicide, defined; penalty.

(1) A person commits assisting suicide when, with intent to assist another person in committing suicide, he aids and abets him in committing or attempting to commit suicide.

(2) Assisting suicide is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 22.